Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.08
School lands; control of noxious weeds; cost.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall be responsible and make necessary expenditures for the control of noxious weeds on all school lands of the state. Any expenditure made by such board for the control of noxious weeds shall be considered a cost of administering unsold school lands.

Laws 1965, c. 428, § 1, p. 1367;

Laws 1978, LB 460, § 2.